Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 11. STATE SYMBOLS AND HONORS; PRESERVATION

SUBTITLE A. STATE SYMBOLS AND HONORS

CHAPTER 3107. TEXAS POLICE SERVICE ANIMALS MEMORIAL MONUMENT

Sec. 3107.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the State Preservation Board.

(2) "Capitol Complex" has the meaning assigned by Section 443.0071.

(3) "Monument" means a Texas Police Service Animals Memorial Monument established under Section 3107.002.

(4) "Police service animal" has the meaning assigned by Section 38.151, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 323 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 3107.002. TEXAS POLICE SERVICE ANIMALS MEMORIAL MONUMENT. Subject to Section 443.0152, the board may establish a Texas Police Service Animals Memorial Monument using board approval procedures on the grounds of the Capitol Complex adjacent to the Texas Peace Officers' Memorial Monument to recognize and honor police service animals that were killed in the line of duty.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 323 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 3107.003. MAINTENANCE OF MONUMENT. (a) If a monument is established under Section 3107.002, the board is responsible for the maintenance of the monument. The board may receive money from private entities for the continued maintenance and update of the monument. If a monument is established under Section 3107.002, the board shall:

(1) establish a schedule for the maintenance of the monument; and

(2) select persons to maintain the monument.

(b) An entity that collects funds for the maintenance and improvement of a monument shall send that money to the board to be deposited in the Capitol fund account.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 323 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 3107.004. ACCOUNT. (a) Money contributed to the state for a purpose related to a monument shall be deposited by the board in the Capitol fund to the credit of a separate interest-bearing account established for the monument.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, income from investments of money in the account shall be deposited to the credit of the account.

(c) Money in the account may be used only for the purposes prescribed by Section 3107.003.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 323 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.